Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2410.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5895SV (2) 91 sc/js S.F. 2410 Section 1. Section 26.2, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraphs: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (7) Equipment acquired by or for a city 3 utility under chapter 388 when such equipment is related to an 4 electric generating project. 5 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (8) The furnishing of a manufactured 6 home, as defined in section 435.1, as well as all work 7 necessary to install the home in accordance with 24 C.F.R. 8 pt. 3285, including but not limited to the erection of the 9 foundation or tiedown system, supporting, anchoring, and 10 close-up of the home, and implementing the utility service 11 connections for the home. 12